Arkansas, session 2025, SB31.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Labor and Licensing - Workers' Compensation Commission for the
2025-2026 fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U100U DLL WCC CHAIRMAN 1 GRADE SE03
(2) U007U DLL WCC COMMISSIONER 2 GRADE SE02
(3) U046U DLL WCC CHIEF EXEC OFFICER 1 GRADE SE01
(4) L038C REGISTERED NURSE 1 GRADE MP01
*KMW002*
01/09/2025 10:57:45 AM KMW002

SB31
(5) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 1 GRADE IT08
(6) D030C INFORMATION SYSTEMS COORDINATOR 1 GRADE IT07
(7) D063C COMPUTER SUPPORT SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT05
(8) D052C SOFTWARE SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT05
(9) D062C DATABASE ANALYST 1 GRADE IT04
(10) D071C COMPUTER SUPPORT ANALYST 1 GRADE IT03
(11) N070N DLL WCC ASST CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER 1 GRADE GS15
(12) G005N DLL WCC CHIEF ADMIN LAW JUDGE 1 GRADE GS15
(13) G010N DLL WCC ADMINISTRATIVE LAW JUDGE 13 GRADE GS14
(14) G004C MANAGING ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS13
(15) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 6 GRADE GS11
(16) G007C DLL WCC DIVISION MANAGER 7 GRADE GS11
(17) G073C ATTORNEY 5 GRADE GS10
(18) A052C ACCOUNTING COORDINATOR 1 GRADE GS09
(19) A042C INSURANCE SENIOR EXAMINER 2 GRADE GS09
(20) G107C DLL WCC PROGRAM MANAGER 4 GRADE GS08
(21) G093C OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS08
(22) R024C ASSISTANT PERSONNEL MANAGER 1 GRADE GS07
(23) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 2 GRADE GS07
(24) C009C HEARING REPORTER 3 GRADE GS07
(25) G168C INDUSTRIAL CONSULTANT 4 GRADE GS07
(26) R027C BUDGET SPECIALIST 1 GRADE GS06
(27) G160C DLL WCC PROGRAM COORDINATOR 2 GRADE GS06
(28) G193C DLL WCC PROGRAM SPECIALIST 13 GRADE GS06
(29) A074C FISCAL SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 4 GRADE GS06
(30) G179C LEGAL SERVICES SPECIALIST 2 GRADE GS06
(31) C036C ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW ANALYST 1 GRADE GS05
(32) C050C ADMINISTRATIVE SUPPORT SUPERVISOR 2 GRADE GS05
(33) X123C INSURANCE INVESTIGATOR 3 GRADE GS05
(34) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 10 GRADE GS04
(35) C046C LEGAL SUPPORT SPECIALIST 3 GRADE GS04
(36) C073C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST II 1 GRADE GS03
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 105

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Department
of Labor and Licensing - Workers' Compensation Commission for the 2025-2026
01/09/2025 10:57:45 AM KMW002

SB31
fiscal year, the following maximum number of part-time or temporary
employees, to be known as "Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated
herein for such purposes: two (2) temporary or part-time employees, when
needed, at rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform
Classification and Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the
appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - WCC ADMINISTRATION. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable from
the Workers' Compensation Fund, for personal services and operating expenses
of the Department of Labor and Licensing - Workers' Compensation Commission -
Administration for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $7,027,198
(02) EXTRA HELP 100,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 2,454,898
(04) OVERTIME 10,000
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 1,305,495
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 20,000
(C) PROF. FEES 240,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 1,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) REFUND/REIMBURSEMENTS - ADMIN 500,000
(07) COMPUTER SOFTWARE/HARDWARE 243,800
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $11,902,391

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - REFUNDS/CLAIMS/INVESTMENTS. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable
from the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund, for refund of
taxes, payment of death and total disability claims, and investment of funds
in the Death and Permanent Total Disability Trust Fund as allowed by the
Department of Labor and Licensing - Workers' Compensation Commission for the
fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:
01/09/2025 10:57:45 AM KMW002

SB31

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REFUND/REIMBURSEMENTS - DEATH AND
TOTAL DISABILITY $550,000
(02) CLAIMS - DEATH AND TOTAL DISABILITY 21,000,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $21,550,000

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - SECOND INJURY CLAIMS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable from
the Second Injury Trust Fund, for payment of second injury claims of the
Department of Labor and Licensing - Workers' Compensation Commission - Second
Injury Claims for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) CLAIMS - SECOND INJURY $500,000

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - SEMINAR - CASH. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be payable from
the cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by the Chief
Fiscal Officer of the State, for scholarships and educational conference
expenses of the Department of Labor and Licensing - Workers' Compensation
Commission for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $85,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 15,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) SCHOLARSHIPS 40,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $140,000

01/09/2025 10:57:45 AM KMW002

SB31
SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - WORKERS' COMPENSATION COMMISSION BUILDING.
There is hereby appropriated, to the Department of Labor and Licensing, to be
payable from the Workers' Compensation Fund, for maintenance, renovation,
equipping, construction, improvement, upgrade and repair projects for the
Department of Labor and Licensing - Workers' Compensation Commission Building
for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) BUILDING REPAIRS AND MAINTENANCE $150,000

SECTION 8. SPECIAL LANGUAGE. NOT TO BE INCORPORATED INTO THE ARKANSAS
CODE NOR PUBLISHED SEPARATELY AS SPECIAL, LOCAL AND TEMPORARY LAW.
WORKERS' COMPENSATION COMMISSION - REFUND TO EXPENDITURE. The proceeds from
the reimbursement of travel expenses received by the Arkansas Workers'
Compensation Commission shall be deposited into the same State Treasury Fund
or Fund Account from which the original travel expenditures was incurred as a
refund to expenditure to the credit of the appropriation from which the
original expenditure was made.
The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2024
2025 through June 30, 2025 2026.

SECTION 9. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 10. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
01/09/2025 10:57:45 AM KMW002

SB31
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 11. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.




















01/09/2025 10:57:45 AM KMW002